District of Columbia statutes.
13-445

Deposition, production, and inspection.

The rules of the Superior Court applicable to compliance with subpoenas to attend and give testimony, produce designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible things, or permit inspection of premises apply to subpoenas issued under § 13-443.

May 22, 2010, D.C. Law 18-147, § 2(b), 57 DCR 2552
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.